District of Columbia statutes.
29-104.07

Change of registered agent by entity.

(a)

A represented entity may change the information on file under § 29-104.04(a) by delivering to the Mayor for filing a statement of change signed on behalf of an authorized person on behalf of the entity which states the:

(1)

Name of the entity; and

(2)

Information that is to be in effect as a result of the filing of the statement of change.

(b)

The interest holders or governors of a domestic entity need not approve the filing of a:

(1)

Statement of change under this section; or

(2)

Similar filing changing the registered agent or registered office, if any, of the entity in any other jurisdiction.

(c)

A statement of change under this section designating a new registered agent shall be an affirmation under § 29-102.09 by the represented entity that the agent has consented to serve.

(d)

As an alternative to using the procedure in this section, a represented entity may change the information on file under § 29-104.04(a) by amending its most recent registered agent filing in a manner provided by law of the District other than this title for amending the filing.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(a)(21), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-102.11, § 29-105.11, § 29-601.11, § 29-702.02, § 29-702.06, § 29-802.02, § 29-802.05, § 29-1202.02, and § 29-1202.05.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “signed on behalf of” for “signed by” in (a); substituted “registered office, if any” for “registered office” in (b)(2); substituted “designating” for “appointing” in (c); repealed former (d), which read: “A statement of change under this section shall be effective on delivery to the Mayor for filing”; and redesignated former (e) as (d).
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.